Tennessee, session 114, HB2226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-601, is amended by deleting
subdivision (b)(3) and subsections (c)-(e).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-602(2), is amended by deleting
the subdivision and substituting:
(2) "Collaborative conferencing" means the process by which the chair of a
board of education and the board's professional employees through designated
representatives for either party meet at reasonable times to confer, consult, and discuss
and to exchange information, opinions, and proposals on matters relating to the terms
and conditions of professional employee service;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-602(10), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(10) "Representative":
(A) Means an organization or association that is designated and
authorized by professional employees or the local board of education to act for
the respective professional employees or the local board of education; and
(B) Does not include an attorney;
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-603, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
(a) Professional employees have the right to request that the professional
employees' local board of education meet at reasonable times to confer, consult, and
HB2226
011458
- 1 -

discuss and to exchange information, opinions, and proposals on matters relating to the
terms and conditions of professional employee service. A local board of education also
has the right to refuse a professional employee's request submitted pursuant to this
subsection (a).
(b) Professional employees also have the right to refrain from any or all activities
described in subsection (a).
(c) A professional employee shall not engage or participate in collaborative
conferencing.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-605, is amended by deleting
this section and substituting:
(a) A local board of education shall not engage or participate in collaborative
conferencing.
(b) This section does not prohibit a local board of education from voluntarily
engaging or participating in consultation with a professional employee.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-606(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (3).
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-606(a)(4), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(4) Permit a professional employees' organization to use or access facilities that
are otherwise prohibited by a local board's policies or procedures for community use;
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-606(b), is amended by deleting
subdivision (2).
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-606(c)(4), is amended by
deleting "resumption of collaborative conferencing or".
- 2 - 011458

SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-607, is amended by deleting
subsection (c).
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-608, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) This section is repealed on July 1, 2026. The repeal of this section does not
affect the rights and obligations or terms of any existing memoranda of understanding
that were entered into prior to July 1, 2026.
SECTION 12. This act does not abridge or impair a contract or agreement entered into
before July 1, 2026. Any such contract or agreement remains in full force and effect until the
expiration of the contract or agreement.
SECTION 13. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 011458